Washington statutes.
RCW 43.164.050

Annual reports.

By December 1, 2024, and annually thereafter, and in compliance with RCW 43.01.036, the department shall report to the governor, the appropriate committees of the legislature, the workforce training and education coordinating board, and the legislative-executive WorkFirst poverty reduction oversight task force on the economic security for all grant program. The annual report must include an analysis of the program, a detailed summary of the quarterly data collected, demographics and geography of people served, services delivered, average length of participation, number of persons served by the grants maintaining self-sufficiency in the years following program exit, and associated recommendations for program delivery. The report must include an analysis of customer feedback and actions taken to respond, based upon a standardized customer feedback mechanism. The report shall be publicized and easily accessible to the public.

[ 2024 c 92 s 6.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—2024 c 92: See note following RCW 43.164.020.